California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) In supervising the alternative-fueled vehicle program, or vehicle electrification program, of an electrical corporation, the commission shall allow the residential service facility upgrade costs incurred as a result of the adoption of home-based electric vehicle charging for basic charging arrangements that exceed the utility’s Electric Tariff Rule 15 (distribution line extensions) and Rule 16 (service line extensions) allowances to be treated as a common facility cost, to be recovered from all residential ratepayers.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the interim policy, known as the Common Treatment for Excess PEV Charging, initially adopted with respect to the state’s three largest electrical corporations in D. 11-07-029, extended in D. 13-06-014, extended again in D. 16-06-011, expanded to include the state’s three smaller electrical corporations in D. 16-11-005, and further extended by the Assigned Commissioner’s Scoping Memorandum and Ruling entered May 2, 2019, and by the order of the Administrative Law Judge entered December 13, 2019 in R. 18-12-066, shall be the policy applied by the commission, and may be revised by the commission after the completion of the electrical corporation’s general rate case cycle in effect on January 1, 2021, if a determination is made that a change in the policy is necessary to ensure just and
 reasonable rates for ratepayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 3.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

740.20.

(a) (1) The commission, the Energy Commission, and the State Air Resources Board shall require that all electric vehicle charging infrastructure and equipment located on the customer side of the electrical meter that is funded or authorized, in whole or in part, by those state entities shall be installed by a contractor with the appropriate license classification, as determined by the Contractors’ State License Board, and at least one electrician on each crew, at any given time, who holds an Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certification.

 (2) The commission, the Energy Commission, and the State Air Resources Board shall
 require that projects funded or authorized, in whole or in part, by those state entities, that install a charging port supplying 25 kilowatts or more to a vehicle have at least 25 percent of the total electricians working on the crew for the project, at any given time, who hold Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certification. 

(3) One member of each crew may be both the contractor and an Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certified
 electrician.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Electric vehicle charging infrastructure installed by employees of an electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility.

(2) Electric vehicle charging infrastructure funded by moneys derived from credits generated from the Low Carbon Fuel Standard Program (Subarticle 7 (commencing with Section 95480) of Article 4 of Subchapter 10 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations).

(3) Single-family home residential electric vehicle chargers that can use an existing 208/240-volt outlet.

(c) An electrician apprenticeship program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards or a continuing education provider approved by the Department of Industrial Relations to provide training to electricians may provide apprentices with Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program training with their own Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certified instructors. The Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certification exam shall be administered by the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program.

(d) The Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program shall provide copies of its Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program curriculum and any updates or revisions to any Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certified instructor
 within 30 days of a request or when the curriculum is updated.

(e) (1) No later than May 1, 2021, and periodically thereafter, the Energy Commission, in consultation with the commission, shall conduct joint public workshops to determine if the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program curriculum and testing should be supplemented to include updated or additional topics necessary to ensure safe installation of charging infrastructure. In conducting the workshops, the Energy Commission shall seek public input from entities, including from labor groups, electrical contractors, electric vehicle service providers, and the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program. The Energy Commission’s determination shall consider cost, cost effectiveness, consensus in the industry, market penetration of new technologies, and
 the availability of supplemental training from other sources. The Energy Commission’s determination shall be reasonable, supplemental, and shall maintain the existing scope and rigor of the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program curriculum and testing. The Energy Commission shall not require the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program to provide product-specific training. If the Energy Commission determines that the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program should be supplemented, the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program shall incorporate this supplemental curriculum and testing within six months of final action by the Energy Commission, unless additional time is reasonably required. The Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program may incorporate supplemental curriculum and testing either as a California-specific supplement to the Electric
 Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certification or as part of the standard Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certification.

(2) As part of the first workshop pursuant to paragraph (1), the Energy Commission, in consultation with the commission, shall evaluate whether additional training and testing is needed to safely install direct current fast charging infrastructure, high voltage charging infrastructure, or charging infrastructure for medium- and heavy-duty vehicles.

(f) Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program training shall qualify as part of the 32 hours of further electrical education that a California certified electrician is required to complete every three years pursuant to Section 291.5 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. 

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (h), subdivision (a) applies to all work performed on or after January 1, 2022, pursuant to any decision made on or after January 1, 2021, by the commission, the Energy Commission, or the State Air Resources Board.

(h) (1) Subdivision (a) applies to any work performed after January 1, 2021, pursuant to decisions described in subdivision (a) of Section 740.18.

(2) Subdivision (a) does not apply to electric vehicle charging infrastructure and equipment that is subject to any agreements or contracts with any public agency entered into prior to January 1, 2021, even if it is funded or authorized after January 1, 2021.

(i) Not later than March 1, 2021, the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program shall offer Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program courses in an online format. The online format shall remain available through December 31, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

740.21.

(a) Each electrical corporation, as part of its distribution planning process, shall consider the fleet data produced by the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 25328 of the Public Resources Code, and other available data, to facilitate the readiness of their distribution systems to support the level of electric vehicle charging anticipated in its service territory by Executive Orders No. B-48-18 and N-79-20, the Energy Commission’s integrated energy policy report adopted pursuant to Section 25302 of the Public Resources Code, the Energy Commission’s assessment prepared pursuant to Section 25229 of the Public Resources Code, State Air Resources Board regulations, air quality
 management plans, regional seaport plans, regional transportation plans, and sustainable communities strategies.

(b) In its general rate case, each electrical corporation shall identify how investments made pursuant to this section will support electric vehicle deployment within its service territory. Each electrical corporation shall consider the electric vehicle deployment goals in Executive Orders No. B-48-18 and N-79-20, the Energy Commission’s integrated energy policy report adopted pursuant to Section 25302 of the Public Resources Code, and the Energy Commission’s assessment prepared pursuant to Section 25229 of the Public Resources Code. Each electrical corporation may also consider relevant State Air Resources Board regulations, air quality management plans, regional seaport plans, regional transportation plans, and sustainable
 communities strategies.

(c) In reviewing electrical corporation proposals to meet the requirements of subdivision (a), the commission shall ensure proposed investments are consistent with preparing the electrical grid for the achievement of the state’s goals and regulations identified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.   (AB 2700)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

740.23.

(a) For purposes of this section, “utility” means an electrical corporation or a gas corporation.

(b) As a part of its general rate case, a utility shall report to the commission all of the following:

(1) For any work category, the amount authorized for the test year in the last general rate case and the amount authorized based on escalation for the last year of the prior general rate case.

(2) For any work category, the actual recorded amounts during the past 10 years split between labor and nonlabor costs and between capital and expenses.

(3) For
 any asset repair, installation, or replacement work, the number of units installed, repaired, or replaced during the past 10 years.

(4) The authorized and actual rate of return and return on equity for the past 10 years.

(5) For distribution capacity, all of the following:

(A) The projects included in the forecast submitted in the prior general rate case.

(B) The projects actually conducted so far in the prior general rate case or planned to be started during the prior general rate case cycle.

(C) Which projects included in the forecast submitted in the prior general rate case are included in the forecast for the pending general rate case.

(D) Which projects included in the prior general rate case have been canceled or indefinitely delayed and the reasons for the cancellation or delay.

(6) A breakdown by program of any capital costs included in the pending general rate case that exceed previously authorized levels or that have not been previously found to be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.   (AB 1017)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

(a) Every owner or operator of telephones available for public use, other than a telephone corporation, that accept any form of payment which, as part of the service furnished, provides operator-assisted services by other than a telephone corporation having tariff schedules on file with the commission providing for the furnishing of operator-assisted services, shall cause to be posted on or near the
 telephone equipment so as to be easily seen by telephone customers all of the following information:

(1) The name of the provider of operator-assisted services and a toll-free telephone number for contacting that provider.

(2) The applicable charges for each available operator-assisted service.

(3) That the provider of operator-assisted services will respond to inquiries concerning the terms and conditions of any available service.

(4) That surcharges may apply to operator-assisted and calling card calls.

(5) That card-activated calls, calls activated by any other payment device, or calls that may be charged to a card by giving a card number to an operator may cost more than coin-activated
 calls.

(6) The local rates for nonoperator-assisted calls.

(b) Every owner or operator of telephones available for public use, other than a telephone corporation, that accept any form of payment which, as part of the service furnished, provides operator-assisted services by other than a telephone corporation having tariff schedules on file with the commission providing for the furnishing of operator-assisted services, shall:

(1) Identify itself, audibly and distinctly, to the consumer at the beginning of each telephone call and before the consumer incurs any charge for the call.

(2) Permit the consumer to terminate the telephone call before the call is connected.

(3) At no charge, disclose
 to the consumer, immediately after the number to be called is entered or given to an operator, a quotation of its complete rates and charges for the call.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 140, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 149.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

741.1.

Every nonpublic utility provider of telephone services, including, but not limited to, a hotel, motel, hospital, or university, which imposes charges on users of the services and which, as part of the service furnished, provides operator-assisted services by other than a telephone corporation having tariff schedules on file with the commission providing for the furnishing of operator-assisted services shall cause to be posted on or near the telephone equipment so as to be easily seen by users of the service all of the following information:

(a) The name of the provider of operator-assisted
 services and a toll-free telephone number for contacting that provider.

(b) The applicable charges for each available operator-assisted service.

(c) That the provider of operator-assisted services will respond to inquiries concerning the terms and conditions of any available service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 648, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

741.2.

(a) No nonpublic utility provider of telephone services, including, but not limited to, a hotel, motel, hospital, university, or similar place of temporary accommodation owning or operating message switching or billing equipment solely for the purpose of reselling services provided by a telephone corporation to its patients or guests is required to file or maintain tariff schedules.

(b) No such nonpublic utility provider of telephone services which provides service to hospital
 patients may charge more for any nontoll telephone call than the maximum rate of charge authorized by the commission for a nontoll call placed from a coin-activated telephone owned or operated by other than a telephone corporation plus twenty-five cents ($0.25).

(c) No such nonpublic utility provider of telephone services which provides service to hospital patients may charge more for any toll telephone call than the sum of all of the following:

(1) The applicable tariff rate or charge of the telephone corporation whose service is resold for that telephone call.

(2) The surcharge or surcharges, if any, applicable to that call if placed from a coin-activated telephone owned or operated by the telephone corporation within whose service area the nonpublic utility provider of telephone services is located, unless that
 surcharge is included in the tariff rate or charge for that call.

(3) Twenty-five cents ($0.25).

(d) No such nonpublic utility provider of telephone services may make any charge for any uncompleted telephone call unless notice pursuant to subdivision (e) is provided specifying the circumstances under which a charge will be made for an uncompleted call.

(e) Every nonpublic utility provider of telephone services shall display or post on or near the telephone equipment so as to be easily seen by telephone users a notice of all of the following:

(1) The charges applicable to all of the available telephone services. These charges shall be separately stated, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(A) Individual customer telephone service activation deposits or fees, if any.

(B) Charges for use of telephone services, irrespective of whether a call is completed.

(2) That these charges are consistent with this section, if applicable.

(3) The telephone number of the Consumer Affairs Division of the commission to which questions or complaints may be directed.

(f) Subdivision (e) does not require separate notices for multiple or extension telephones having the same telephone extension number.

(g) This section does not require any such nonpublic utility provider of telephone services to make any charge for the furnishing of any
 telephone service, and this section does not apply to any such provider that makes no charge for telephone services furnished. This section does not constitute any such provider a telephone corporation or otherwise subject it to regulation by the commission as a public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 681, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

741.3.

The commission shall, by rule or order, adopt and enforce operating requirements applicable to operator-assisted telephone services, whether furnished by a telephone corporation or other than a telephone corporation, for nonpublic utility providers of telephone services, including, but not limited to, hotels, motels, hospitals, universities, and similar places of temporary accommodation owning or operating message switching or billing equipment solely for the purpose of reselling services provided by a telephone corporation to its patients or guests. These operating requirements shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) That there be displayed or posted on or near the telephone equipment so as to be easily seen by telephone users a notice stating the identity of the nonpublic utility provider of the telephone services; the method for obtaining the rates, terms, or conditions of operator-assisted services; the operator-assisted services provider’s procedures for handling complaints; the means by which the telephone user may gain access to other providers of operator-assisted services; and the means by which the telephone user may gain access to the services of the telephone corporation operating within the service area within which the telephone services of the nonpublic utility provider are furnished. The notice shall also provide the telephone number of the Consumer Affairs Division of the commission to which questions or complaints may be directed.

(b) That, when contacted for service by the
 telephone user, the operator-assisted services provider orally identify itself by name prior to the connection of the telephone call or the commencement of any charges.

(c) That the telephone equipment permit access by the telephone user to any other provider of operator-assisted services generally available in the service area.

(d) Any other operating requirement determined necessary and in the public interest by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

(a) The commission shall, by rule or order, adopt and enforce operating requirements for telephones available for public use that accept any form of payment and that are owned or operated by corporations or persons other than telephone corporations. These requirements shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following: 

(1) A requirement
 that the telephone corporation furnishing service to the corporation or person owning or operating a telephone that accepts any form of payment terminate service for any violation of the commission’s rules or orders or of this section, upon a determination by the commission that the violation was a significant or repeated violation. Any determination by the commission leading to a termination of service shall be made in accordance with commission rules or orders adopted pursuant to this subdivision. 

(2) A requirement that every telephone permit a caller to be connected with the operator personnel of any telephone corporation authorized by the commission to operate within a service area by dialing the numeral “0” and with the emergency services switchboard reached by dialing the numerals “911” without insertion of any coin or without any other form of payment. 

(3) A requirement
 that every telephone contain instructions for both local and long distance dialing, the name of the owner or operator of the telephone, and the telephone number of that owner or operator to which complaints can be made. 

(4) A requirement that every telephone display its telephone number or other identification number, as determined by the commission, and the address at which the telephone is located, on the telephone in a place where that information may be seen by a person using the telephone. 

(b) The commission shall require every telephone corporation that publishes a directory of subscribers to include in that directory information comprising the substance of this section and the rules and orders of the commission adopted pursuant to this section. 

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 140, Sec. 4.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

742.1.

(a) The commission shall, by rule or order, adopt and enforce operating requirements for every corporation or person, other than a telephone corporation, which, as part of the services furnished, furnishes operator-assisted services by other than a telephone corporation having tariff schedules on file with the commission. These requirements shall include, but not be limited to, a requirement that furnishing these operator-assisted services for telephone calls within a service area is prohibited unless the commission, after instituting a proceeding for the purpose, finds and determines that to permit these operator-assisted services is in
 the public interest.

(b) The commission shall require every telephone corporation which publishes a directory of subscribers to include in that directory information comprising the substance of this section and the rules and orders of the commission adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1058, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

742.3.

The commission shall, by rule or order, adopt and enforce an operating requirement for coin-activated and credit card-activated telephones available for public use, whether owned by telephone corporations or persons other than telephone corporations, which requires that every telephone display a notice that surcharges may apply to operator-assisted and calling card calls. The required signage shall be phased in over a period of two years beginning on January 1, 1993. A sticker with the necessary notification may be used as an interim measure until January 1,
 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 539, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

742.5.

(a) No telephone corporation which operates within a service area shall provide billing and collection services for either of the following:

(1) Any telephone corporation which has not obtained a certificate of public convenience and necessity but is required to do so.

(2) Any person or corporation providing billing and collection services for any telephone corporation which has not obtained a certificate of public convenience and necessity but is required to do so.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a telephone corporation operating within a service area from providing billing and collection services for a provider of enhanced service, as defined by Section 64.702 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) No telephone corporation which provides billing and collection services for any call placed by a subscriber of the telephone corporation from a coin-activated telephone available for public use owned or operated by other than a telephone corporation shall transmit any charge which is in excess of the maximum tariff rate or charge for that call placed from that telephone, as determined by the commission. Any reasonable cost incurred by the telephone corporation in verifying any such charge may be included in the fees or charges for conducting the billing and collection services. The commission shall adopt rules and procedures for the
 implementation of this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1014, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

743.

(a) As used in this section, “steel producer” means a producer of steel products in California which in 1981 or any subsequent year produced at least 75,000 tons of rolled or finished steel and which has a maximum demand for electricity of 4,000 kilowatts or more at one plant location. Any steel producer which transfers any substantial amount of employment from its facilities in this state to any out-of-state facility or otherwise substantially reduces employment at its facilities in this state below the June 30, 1985, level, or fails to maintain and make reasonable and prudent investments in its facilities, as determined by the
 commission, is ineligible for any electric rate established pursuant to this section. 

(b) As used in this section, “frozen food processor” means a corporation or person engaged in the processing of food in California, which food is classified according to the Standard Industrial Classification Manual, 1972, in Industry No. 2037 and Industry No. 2038 of Group 203, of Food and Kindred Products Major Group 20, as specified in Section 2900.3 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. “Processing of food” includes the postprocessing storage of frozen food in a warehouse, or other facility, until the frozen food leaves the control or responsibility of the frozen food processor or until the frozen food processor no longer has an obligation to store the food. 

(c) As used in this section, “system average rate” means total jurisdictional revenues of the electrical corporation divided
 by total jurisdictional sales. 

(d) Every electrical corporation furnishing electricity to a steel producer, frozen food processor, or other heavy-industry customer, as determined and specified by the electrical corporation, shall prepare and file tariffs providing rates which shall be lower than the system average rate and take into consideration all of the following: 

(1) Specific service requirements of individual customers, including, but not limited to, reliability, interruptability, quantity of use, and requirements of voltage. 

(2) Incentives to achieve conservation, improvements in efficiency, and time-of-day load shifting. 

(3) Implementation at the option of the customer. 

(4) Cost of service.

(e) The commission shall consider and approve tariffs which shall be consistent with this section and which shall be in effect on and after July 1, 1992. 

(f) The commission may approve contracts between an electrical corporation and its heavy industrial customers as determined by the electrical corporation, of not more than ten years’ duration, in which the electrical corporation buys from the heavy industrial customer the right to interrupt the customer’s service on short notice, as determined by the commission. The payment mechanism may include a discounted rate for service. In approving and determining the reasonableness of these contracts, the commission may consider, among other things, the price paid by the electrical corporation for the right to interrupt, the value of that right to the utility system and its ratepayers, and the benefits
 to the ratepayers and the people of the state of retaining heavy industrial customers. Throughout the term of any of these contracts, the commission shall have the right to amend the contract. Every contract subject to this subdivision shall include a provision indicating that the contract is subject to amendment by the commission as provided in this subdivision. This subdivision does not supersede the requirement of subdivision (d) that the commission establish a heavy industrial tariff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

743.3.

(a) Beginning January 15, 2002, and at least once monthly thereafter, an electrical corporation shall notify each air pollution control district and air quality management district of the name and address of each entity within the district’s boundaries within the electrical corporation’s control or service area with whom the electrical corporation enters into an interruptible service contract or similar arrangement.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “interruptible service contract or similar arrangement” means any arrangement in which a nonresidential electrical customer agrees to reduce or consider reducing its electrical consumption during
 periods of peak demand or at the request of the Independent System Operator in exchange for compensation, or for assurances not to be blacked out or other similar nonmonetary assurances.

(c) The local air pollution control district or air quality management district shall maintain in a confidential manner the information received pursuant to this section. However, nothing in this subdivision shall affect the applicability of Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, or of any other similar open records statute or ordinance, to information provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 398.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

744.

(a) As used in this section, “agricultural producer” means any person or corporation whose principal purpose is the agrarian production of food or fiber.

(b) Every electrical corporation furnishing electricity to an agricultural producer shall, in addition to its regular service, prepare and file tariffs providing, where economically and technologically feasible, for optional alternative interruptible service to any agricultural producer upon reasonable notice to the agricultural producer consistent with safety of operations by the agricultural
 producer and providing for limits upon the frequency and duration of interruption of service which the commission finds are reasonable in relation to the needs of the electrical corporation for reductions in load to meet system peak requirements and the burdens imposed upon the agricultural producer of reducing its operations during periods of interruption of electrical service. The commission shall establish the rate for this service at an appropriate discount from the system average rate, which shall be not less than the cost of furnishing this service.

(c) Every electrical corporation furnishing electricity to an agricultural producer shall, in addition to its regular service, prepare and file tariffs providing for an optional off-peak demand service, including the availability of time-differentiating meters or other measurement devices, to any agricultural producer providing for furnishing electricity to the agricultural producer during
 periods of off-peak demand and which the commission finds are reasonable in relation to the needs of the electrical corporation for reduction in demand to meet system peak requirements and the burdens imposed upon the agricultural producer of scheduling its operations to coincide with the periods of off-peak demand. The off-peak demand service tariff shall be composed of a two-part time differentiated schedule consisting of on- and off-peak rates. The commission shall establish the rate for this service at an appropriate discount from the system average rate, which shall be not less than the cost of furnishing this service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 538, Sec. 2.   Effective August 21, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

744.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Public Utilities Commission shall, as soon as is practicable after the operative date of the act adding this section, require every electrical corporation which furnishes electricity to an agricultural producer to provide, in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (c), citrus and avocado producers with an electrical energy payment deferral program related to the production of citrus and avocado crops. 

(b) For the purposes of this section, “agricultural producer” shall be as defined in
 subdivision (a) of Section 744. 

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon verification by the agricultural producer of freeze-related crop losses of not less than 50 percent, the electrical corporation shall provide the electrical energy payment deferral program referenced in subdivision (a). For the purposes of this subdivision, the electrical corporation shall accept the original or a true photocopy of any of the following as verification of crop losses: 

(1) A statement from a packing house or handler. A person who exercises managing control in a packing house shall provide at least one of the documents set forth in paragraphs 2 to 5, inclusive, in addition to, or in place of, the document set forth in this paragraph. 

(2) A statement from a farm adviser of the University of California. 

(3) A statement from the county agricultural commissioner. 

(4) A statement of insurance adjustment. 

(5) A calamity claim to the county tax assessor. 

(d) For the purposes of this section, “deferral period” shall mean June 1, 1991, to March 31, 1992, inclusive. Electricity bills incurred by agricultural producers during the deferral period shall be eligible for deferral pursuant to this section. 

(e) (1) Deferral programs under this section shall be developed on an individual basis between the electrical energy corporation and the eligible agricultural producers. These deferral programs shall allow eligible agricultural producers, at their option, to defer, without
 incurring interest charges, up to 50 percent of each electricity bill incurred during the deferral period on accounts or amounts attributable to the production of citrus or avocado crops. 

(2) At the end of the deferral period, participating agricultural producers shall keep each month’s charges current and pay the accrued deferrals in up to 18 equal monthly installment payments. To be eligible for the maximum 50 percent deferral and the maximum 18-month repayment period, an agricultural producer shall do all of the following: 

(A) Verify crop losses in accordance with subdivision (c). 

(B) Demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the electrical energy corporation, which accounts are, or which portion of the amount billed is, attributable to the production of citrus or avocado crops. 

(C) Pay, on or before the due date of each bill during the deferral period, at least 50 percent of the charges incurred on each bill. 

(f) The electrical energy corporation may require a security interest in crops, real property, or other security acceptable to the electrical energy corporation, as a condition of deferring payments pursuant to this section. Any deferral by the electrical energy corporation of one or more electricity bills pursuant to this section shall not constitute a waiver by the corporation of its authority to require security for amounts already deferred or subsequently deferred. 

(g) Each electrical energy corporation shall establish a balancing account to reflect the amounts of the deferrals and the costs of the payment deferral program. All of the costs of the payment deferral program,
 including, but not limited to, uncollectible amounts, interest, and administrative costs, shall be fully recovered from all customers of the electrical energy corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   Effective August 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

745.

(a) For purposes of this section, “time-variant pricing” includes time-of-use rates, critical peak pricing, and real-time pricing, but does not include programs that provide customers with discounts from standard tariff rates as an incentive to reduce consumption at certain times, including peak time rebates.

(b) The commission may authorize an
 electrical corporation to offer residential customers the option of receiving service pursuant to time-variant pricing and to participate in other demand response programs. The commission shall not establish a mandatory or default time-variant pricing tariff for any residential customer except as authorized in subdivision (c).

(c) Beginning January 1, 2018, and subject to the commission making the findings required by subdivision (d), the commission may require or authorize an electrical corporation to employ default time-of-use rates for residential customers subject to all of the following:

(1) Residential customers receiving a medical baseline allowance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 739, customers requesting third-party notification pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 779.1, customers who the commission has ordered cannot be disconnected from service without an
 in-person visit from a utility representative (Decision 12-03-054 (March 22, 2012), Decision on Phase II Issues: Adoption of Practices to Reduce the Number of Gas and Electric Service Disconnections, Order 2 (b) at page 55), and other customers designated by the commission in its discretion shall not be subject to default time-of-use rates without their affirmative consent.

(2) The commission shall ensure that any time-of-use rate schedule does not cause unreasonable hardship for senior citizens or economically vulnerable customers in hot climate zones.

(3) The commission shall strive for time-of-use rate schedules that utilize time periods that are appropriate for at least the following five years.

(4) A residential customer shall not be subject to a default time-of-use rate schedule unless that residential customer
 has been provided with not less than one year of interval usage data from an advanced meter and associated customer education and, following the passage of this period, is provided with no less than one year of bill protection during which the total amount paid by the residential customer for electric service shall not exceed the amount that would have been payable by the residential customer under that customer’s previous rate schedule.

(5) Each electrical corporation shall provide each residential customer, not less than once per year, using a reasonable delivery method of the customer’s choosing, a summary of available tariff options with a calculation of expected annual bill impacts under each available tariff. The summary shall not be provided to customers who notify the utility that they choose not to receive the summary. The reasonable costs of providing this service shall be recovered in rates.
